Indiana, session 2026, SB63.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 5-10-5.5-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2008,
2 SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
3 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Benefits provided under this section are
4 subject to section 2.5 of this chapter.
5 (b) Except as provided in section 10.5 of this chapter, the annual
6 retirement allowance of a participant, payable in equal monthly
7 installments beginning on the participant's normal retirement date, shall
8 be a percentage of the participant's average annual salary, such
9 percentage to be twenty-five percent (25%) increased by one and
10 two-thirds percent (1 2/3%) of the participant's average annual salary
11 for each completed year of creditable service more than ten (10) years.
12 However, the annual retirement allowance computed under this
13 subsection may not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the
14 participant's average annual salary.
15 (c) The annual retirement allowance under subsection (b) shall
16 cease with the last monthly payment prior to the death of the
17 participant.
18 SECTION 2. IC 5-10-5.5-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

2
1 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) This section applies to a
3 participant who retires after June 30, 2026.
4 (b) A participant may elect a joint and survivor option for the
5 payment of the participant's retirement allowance instead of the
6 annual retirement allowance provided under section 10 of this
7 chapter. The amount of the optional payments shall be determined
8 under rules of the board and shall be the actuarial equivalent of the
9 benefit payable under section 10 of this chapter.
10 (c) The following apply to the joint and survivor option under
11 subsection (b):
12 (1) The participant receives a decreased retirement benefit
13 during the participant's lifetime, and there is a benefit
14 payable after the participant's death to a designated
15 beneficiary during the lifetime of the beneficiary, which
16 benefit equals, at the option of the participant, either the full
17 decreased retirement benefit or two-thirds (2/3) or one-half
18 (1/2) of that benefit.
19 (2) If the participant dies before retirement, the designated
20 beneficiary may receive survivors' benefits if the individual is
21 entitled to survivors' benefits under section 16.3 of this
22 chapter.
23 (3) If the designated beneficiary dies before the participant
24 retires, the election is automatically canceled and the
25 participant may make a new beneficiary election. A
26 participant described by this subdivision may elect the joint
27 and survivor option after making a new beneficiary election.
28 SECTION 3. IC 5-10-5.5-16.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.6-2020,
29 SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
30 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16.3. (a) This section applies to:
31 (1) an active participant, regardless of the participant's years of
32 creditable service; and
33 (2) an inactive participant with at least fifteen (15) years of
34 creditable service;
35 who dies other than in the line of duty after January 31, 2018. Except
36 as provided in section 10.5(c)(2) of this chapter, this section does
37 not apply to a participant who elects the joint and survivor option
38 under section 10.5 of this chapter.
39 (b) Benefits provided under this section are subject to section 2.5 of
40 this chapter.
41 (c) A surviving mother or father nominated by the participant to
42 receive survivors' benefits under the provisions of this chapter is
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

3
1 entitled to an annual survivors' allowance for life equal to fifty percent
2 (50%) of the amount to which the participant would have been entitled
3 if the participant had retired with twenty-five (25) years of service at
4 fifty (50) years of age.
5 (d) A surviving spouse nominated by the participant to receive
6 survivors' benefits under the provisions of this chapter is entitled to an
7 annual survivors' allowance equal to fifty percent (50%) of the amount
8 to which the participant would have been entitled if the participant had
9 retired with twenty-five (25) years of service at fifty (50) years of age.
10 A survivors' allowance payable to a surviving spouse under this
11 subsection ends with the last payment before the surviving spouse's
12 death.
13 (e) An eligible surviving child who is nominated by the participant
14 to receive survivors' benefits under this chapter is entitled to an annual
15 survivors' allowance equal to fifty percent (50%) of the amount to
16 which the participant would have been entitled if the participant had
17 retired with twenty-five (25) years of service at fifty (50) years of age.
18 If more than one (1) eligible surviving child is nominated to receive
19 survivors' benefits, the annual survivors' allowance shall be divided
20 equally between or among the eligible surviving children who were
21 nominated to receive survivors' benefits. A survivors' allowance to a
22 child ends when the child attains the age of eighteen (18) years or
23 marries, whichever occurs first. If a survivors' allowance is divided
24 between or among more than one (1) child, and payments to one (1) or
25 more children receiving the survivor's allowance cease because of the
26 age, marriage, or death of the child, the total annual survivors'
27 allowance payable under this subsection shall be divided evenly among
28 or between the surviving children, if any, who remain eligible to
29 receive the survivors' allowance.
30 SECTION 4. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
31 SECTION, "fund" refers to the Indiana state teachers' retirement
32 fund established by IC 5-10.4-2-1.
33 (b) As used in this SECTION, "supplemental allowance reserve
34 account" refers to the supplemental allowance reserve account
35 established under IC 5-10.2-2-2(c)(3).
36 (c) Not later than October 1, 2026, the supplemental allowance
37 reserve account shall pay to a member of the fund (or to a survivor
38 or beneficiary of a member) who retired or was disabled on or
39 before December 1, 2025, and who is entitled to receive a monthly
40 benefit on July 1, 2026, the amount determined under subsection
41 (d) for a member of the fund. The amount is not an increase in the
42 pension portion of the monthly benefit.
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

4
1 (d) For purposes of determining the amount paid under
2 subsection (c) to a member of the fund (or to a survivor or
3 beneficiary of a member) who meets the requirements of
4 subsection (c), the applicable amount is determined as follows:
5 If a Member's Creditable The Amount Is:
6 Service Is:
7 At least 5 years, but less than 10 years $150
8 At least 10 years, but less than 20 years $275
9 At least 20 years, but less than 30 years $375
10 At least 30 years $450
11 (e) The creditable service used to determine the amount paid to
12 a member (or to a survivor or beneficiary of a member) under
13 subsection (c) is the creditable service that was used to compute the
14 member's retirement benefit under IC 5-10.2-4-4, except that
15 partial years of creditable service may not be used to determine the
16 amount paid under subsection (c).
17 (f) If two (2) or more survivors or beneficiaries of a member are
18 entitled to an amount paid under subsection (c), the amount shall
19 be allocated to the survivors or beneficiaries in shares using the
20 same percentages as the percentages determined under
21 IC 5-10.2-3-7.5 or IC 5-10.4-4-10 to pay the monthly benefit to the
22 survivors or beneficiaries.
23 (g) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 5-10.2-12-4(b).
24 (h) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
25 SECTION 5. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
26 SECTION, "fund" refers to the Indiana public employees'
27 retirement fund established by IC 5-10.3-2-1.
28 (b) As used in this SECTION, "supplemental allowance reserve
29 account" refers to the supplemental allowance reserve account
30 established under IC 5-10.2-2-2(a)(3).
31 (c) Not later than October 1, 2026, the supplemental allowance
32 reserve account shall pay to a member of the fund (or to a survivor
33 or beneficiary of a member) who retired or was disabled on or
34 before December 1, 2025, and who is entitled to receive a monthly
35 benefit on July 1, 2026, the amount determined under subsection
36 (d) for the member of the fund. The amount is not an increase in
37 the pension portion of the monthly benefit.
38 (d) For purposes of determining the amount paid under
39 subsection (c) to a member of the fund (or to a survivor or
40 beneficiary of a member) who meets the requirements of
41 subsection (c), the applicable amount is determined as follows:
42 If a Member's Creditable The Amount Is:
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

5
1 Service Is:
2 At least 5 years, but less than 10 years $150
3 At least 10 years, but less than 20 years $275
4 At least 20 years, but less than 30 years $375
5 At least 30 years $450
6 (e) The creditable service used to determine the amount paid to
7 a member (or to a survivor or beneficiary of a member) under
8 subsection (c) is the creditable service that was used to compute the
9 member's retirement benefit under IC 5-10.2-4-4, except that
10 partial years of creditable service may not be used to determine the
11 amount paid under subsection (c).
12 (f) If two (2) or more survivors or beneficiaries of a member are
13 entitled to an amount paid under subsection (c), the amount shall
14 be allocated to the survivors or beneficiaries in shares using the
15 same percentages as the percentages determined under
16 IC 5-10.2-3-7.5 or IC 5-10.3-8-15 to pay the monthly benefit to the
17 survivors or beneficiaries.
18 (g) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 5-10.2-12-4(b).
19 (h) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
20 SECTION 6. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
21 SECTION, "participant" has the meaning set forth in
22 IC 5-10-5.5-1.
23 (b) As used in this SECTION, "plan" refers to the state excise
24 police, gaming agent, gaming control officer, and conservation
25 enforcement officers' retirement plan created by IC 5-10-5.5-2.
26 (c) As used in this SECTION, "supplemental allowance reserve
27 account" refers to the supplemental allowance reserve account
28 established under IC 5-10-5.5-4(c).
29 (d) Not later than October 1, 2026, the supplemental allowance
30 reserve account shall pay to a plan participant (or to a survivor or
31 beneficiary of a plan participant) who:
32 (1) retired or was disabled on or before July 2, 2025; and
33 (2) is entitled to receive a monthly benefit as of September 1,
34 2026;
35 an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the maximum basic annual
36 pension amount payable to a retired state police employee in the
37 grade of trooper who has completed twenty-five (25) years of
38 service as of July 1, 2026, as calculated under IC 10-12-4-7. The
39 amount is not an increase in the pension portion of the monthly
40 benefit.
41 (e) If two (2) or more survivors or beneficiaries of a plan
42 participant are entitled to an amount paid under subsection (d), the
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

6
1 amount shall be allocated to the survivors or beneficiaries in shares
2 using the same percentages as the percentages determined under
3 IC 5-10-5.5-16 or IC 5-10-5.5-16.3 to pay the monthly benefit to the
4 survivors or beneficiaries.
5 (f) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 5-10.2-12-4(b).
6 (g) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
7 SECTION 7. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
8 SECTION, "trustee" has the meaning set forth in IC 10-12-1-10.
9 (b) As used in this SECTION, "trust fund" has the meaning set
10 forth in IC 10-12-1-11.
11 (c) Not later than October 1, 2026, the trustee shall pay from the
12 trust fund to each employee beneficiary of the state police pre-1987
13 benefit system covered by IC 10-12-3 who:
14 (1) retired or was disabled before July 2, 2025; and
15 (2) is entitled to receive a monthly benefit as of September 1,
16 2026;
17 an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the maximum basic annual
18 pension amount payable to a retired state police employee in the
19 grade of trooper who has completed twenty (20) years of service as
20 of July 1, 2026, as calculated under IC 10-12-3-7.
21 (d) The amounts paid under this SECTION are not an increase
22 in the monthly pension amount of an employee beneficiary.
23 (e) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 10-12-7-2.
24 (f) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
25 SECTION 8. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
26 SECTION, "trustee" has the meaning set forth in IC 10-12-1-10.
27 (b) As used in this SECTION, "trust fund" has the meaning set
28 forth in IC 10-12-1-11.
29 (c) Not later than October 1, 2026, the trustee shall pay from the
30 trust fund to each employee beneficiary of the state police 1987
31 benefit system covered by IC 10-12-4 who:
32 (1) retired or was disabled after June 30, 1987, and before
33 July 2, 2025; and
34 (2) is entitled to receive a monthly benefit as of September 1,
35 2026;
36 an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the maximum basic annual
37 pension amount payable to a retired state police employee in the
38 grade of trooper who has completed twenty-five (25) years of
39 service as of July 1, 2026, as calculated under IC 10-12-4-7.
40 (d) The amount paid under this SECTION is not an increase in
41 the monthly pension amount of an employee beneficiary.
42 (e) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 10-12-7-2.
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

7
1 (f) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

8
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Pensions and Labor, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 63, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Delete the title and insert the following:
A BILL FOR AN ACT to amend the Indiana Code concerning
pensions.
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 5-10-5.5-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2008,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Benefits provided under this section are
subject to section 2.5 of this chapter.
(b) Except as provided in section 10.5 of this chapter, the annual
retirement allowance of a participant, payable in equal monthly
installments beginning on the participant's normal retirement date, shall
be a percentage of the participant's average annual salary, such
percentage to be twenty-five percent (25%) increased by one and
two-thirds percent (1 2/3%) of the participant's average annual salary
for each completed year of creditable service more than ten (10) years.
However, the annual retirement allowance computed under this
subsection may not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the
participant's average annual salary.
(c) The annual retirement allowance under subsection (b) shall
cease with the last monthly payment prior to the death of the
participant.
SECTION 2. IC 5-10-5.5-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) This section applies to a
participant who retires after June 30, 2026.
(b) A participant may elect a joint and survivor option for the
payment of the participant's retirement allowance instead of the
annual retirement allowance provided under section 10 of this
chapter. The amount of the optional payments shall be determined
under rules of the board and shall be the actuarial equivalent of the
benefit payable under section 10 of this chapter.
(c) The following apply to the joint and survivor option under
subsection (b):
(1) The participant receives a decreased retirement benefit
during the participant's lifetime, and there is a benefit
payable after the participant's death to a designated
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

9
beneficiary during the lifetime of the beneficiary, which
benefit equals, at the option of the participant, either the full
decreased retirement benefit or two-thirds (2/3) or one-half
(1/2) of that benefit.
(2) If the participant dies before retirement, the designated
beneficiary may receive survivors' benefits if the individual is
entitled to survivors' benefits under section 16.3 of this
chapter.
(3) If the designated beneficiary dies before the participant
retires, the election is automatically canceled and the
participant may make a new beneficiary election. A
participant described by this subdivision may elect the joint
and survivor option after making a new beneficiary election.
SECTION 3. IC 5-10-5.5-16.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.6-2020,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16.3. (a) This section applies to:
(1) an active participant, regardless of the participant's years of
creditable service; and
(2) an inactive participant with at least fifteen (15) years of
creditable service;
who dies other than in the line of duty after January 31, 2018. Except
as provided in section 10.5(c)(2) of this chapter, this section does
not apply to a participant who elects the joint and survivor option
under section 10.5 of this chapter.
(b) Benefits provided under this section are subject to section 2.5 of
this chapter.
(c) A surviving mother or father nominated by the participant to
receive survivors' benefits under the provisions of this chapter is
entitled to an annual survivors' allowance for life equal to fifty percent
(50%) of the amount to which the participant would have been entitled
if the participant had retired with twenty-five (25) years of service at
fifty (50) years of age.
(d) A surviving spouse nominated by the participant to receive
survivors' benefits under the provisions of this chapter is entitled to an
annual survivors' allowance equal to fifty percent (50%) of the amount
to which the participant would have been entitled if the participant had
retired with twenty-five (25) years of service at fifty (50) years of age.
A survivors' allowance payable to a surviving spouse under this
subsection ends with the last payment before the surviving spouse's
death.
(e) An eligible surviving child who is nominated by the participant
to receive survivors' benefits under this chapter is entitled to an annual
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

10
survivors' allowance equal to fifty percent (50%) of the amount to
which the participant would have been entitled if the participant had
retired with twenty-five (25) years of service at fifty (50) years of age.
If more than one (1) eligible surviving child is nominated to receive
survivors' benefits, the annual survivors' allowance shall be divided
equally between or among the eligible surviving children who were
nominated to receive survivors' benefits. A survivors' allowance to a
child ends when the child attains the age of eighteen (18) years or
marries, whichever occurs first. If a survivors' allowance is divided
between or among more than one (1) child, and payments to one (1) or
more children receiving the survivor's allowance cease because of the
age, marriage, or death of the child, the total annual survivors'
allowance payable under this subsection shall be divided evenly among
or between the surviving children, if any, who remain eligible to
receive the survivors' allowance.".
Page 1, line 6, delete "by" and insert "under".
Page 1, line 8, delete "the amount determined under subsection".
Page 1, line 9, delete "(d)".
Page 1, line 12, delete "2026." and insert "2026, the amount
determined under subsection (d) for a member of the fund.".
Page 1, line 14, delete "The" and insert "For purposes of
determining the".
Page 1, line 16, delete "subsection (c) is determined as follows:" and
insert "subsection (c), the applicable amount is determined as
follows:
If a Member's Creditable The Amount Is:
Service Is:
At least 5 years, but less than 10 years $150
At least 10 years, but less than 20 years $275
At least 20 years, but less than 30 years $375
At least 30 years $450
(e) The creditable service used to determine the amount paid to
a member (or to a survivor or beneficiary of a member) under
subsection (c) is the creditable service that was used to compute the
member's retirement benefit under IC 5-10.2-4-4, except that
partial years of creditable service may not be used to determine the
amount paid under subsection (c).
(f) If two (2) or more survivors or beneficiaries of a member are
entitled to an amount paid under subsection (c), the amount shall
be allocated to the survivors or beneficiaries in shares using the
same percentages as the percentages determined under
IC 5-10.2-3-7.5 or IC 5-10.4-4-10 to pay the monthly benefit to the
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

11
survivors or beneficiaries.
(g) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 5-10.2-12-4(b).
(h) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 5. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "fund" refers to the Indiana public employees'
retirement fund established by IC 5-10.3-2-1.
(b) As used in this SECTION, "supplemental allowance reserve
account" refers to the supplemental allowance reserve account
established under IC 5-10.2-2-2(a)(3).
(c) Not later than October 1, 2026, the supplemental allowance
reserve account shall pay to a member of the fund (or to a survivor
or beneficiary of a member) who retired or was disabled on or
before December 1, 2025, and who is entitled to receive a monthly
benefit on July 1, 2026, the amount determined under subsection
(d) for the member of the fund. The amount is not an increase in
the pension portion of the monthly benefit.
(d) For purposes of determining the amount paid under
subsection (c) to a member of the fund (or to a survivor or
beneficiary of a member) who meets the requirements of
subsection (c), the applicable amount is determined as follows:
If a Member's Creditable The Amount Is:
Service Is:
At least 5 years, but less than 10 years $150
At least 10 years, but less than 20 years $275
At least 20 years, but less than 30 years $375
At least 30 years $450
(e) The creditable service used to determine the amount paid to
a member (or to a survivor or beneficiary of a member) under
subsection (c) is the creditable service that was used to compute the
member's retirement benefit under IC 5-10.2-4-4, except that
partial years of creditable service may not be used to determine the
amount paid under subsection (c).
(f) If two (2) or more survivors or beneficiaries of a member are
entitled to an amount paid under subsection (c), the amount shall
be allocated to the survivors or beneficiaries in shares using the
same percentages as the percentages determined under
IC 5-10.2-3-7.5 or IC 5-10.3-8-15 to pay the monthly benefit to the
survivors or beneficiaries.
(g) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 5-10.2-12-4(b).
(h) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 6. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "participant" has the meaning set forth in
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

12
IC 5-10-5.5-1.
(b) As used in this SECTION, "plan" refers to the state excise
police, gaming agent, gaming control officer, and conservation
enforcement officers' retirement plan created by IC 5-10-5.5-2.
(c) As used in this SECTION, "supplemental allowance reserve
account" refers to the supplemental allowance reserve account
established under IC 5-10-5.5-4(c).
(d) Not later than October 1, 2026, the supplemental allowance
reserve account shall pay to a plan participant (or to a survivor or
beneficiary of a plan participant) who:
(1) retired or was disabled on or before July 2, 2025; and
(2) is entitled to receive a monthly benefit as of September 1,
2026;
an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the maximum basic annual
pension amount payable to a retired state police employee in the
grade of trooper who has completed twenty-five (25) years of
service as of July 1, 2026, as calculated under IC 10-12-4-7. The
amount is not an increase in the pension portion of the monthly
benefit.
(e) If two (2) or more survivors or beneficiaries of a plan
participant are entitled to an amount paid under subsection (d), the
amount shall be allocated to the survivors or beneficiaries in shares
using the same percentages as the percentages determined under
IC 5-10-5.5-16 or IC 5-10-5.5-16.3 to pay the monthly benefit to the
survivors or beneficiaries.
(f) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 5-10.2-12-4(b).
(g) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 7. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "trustee" has the meaning set forth in IC 10-12-1-10.
(b) As used in this SECTION, "trust fund" has the meaning set
forth in IC 10-12-1-11.
(c) Not later than October 1, 2026, the trustee shall pay from the
trust fund to each employee beneficiary of the state police pre-1987
benefit system covered by IC 10-12-3 who:
(1) retired or was disabled before July 2, 2025; and
(2) is entitled to receive a monthly benefit as of September 1,
2026;
an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the maximum basic annual
pension amount payable to a retired state police employee in the
grade of trooper who has completed twenty (20) years of service as
of July 1, 2026, as calculated under IC 10-12-3-7.
(d) The amounts paid under this SECTION are not an increase
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153

13
in the monthly pension amount of an employee beneficiary.
(e) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 10-12-7-2.
(f) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 8. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "trustee" has the meaning set forth in IC 10-12-1-10.
(b) As used in this SECTION, "trust fund" has the meaning set
forth in IC 10-12-1-11.
(c) Not later than October 1, 2026, the trustee shall pay from the
trust fund to each employee beneficiary of the state police 1987
benefit system covered by IC 10-12-4 who:
(1) retired or was disabled after June 30, 1987, and before
July 2, 2025; and
(2) is entitled to receive a monthly benefit as of September 1,
2026;
an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the maximum basic annual
pension amount payable to a retired state police employee in the
grade of trooper who has completed twenty-five (25) years of
service as of July 1, 2026, as calculated under IC 10-12-4-7.
(d) The amount paid under this SECTION is not an increase in
the monthly pension amount of an employee beneficiary.
(e) This SECTION applies notwithstanding IC 10-12-7-2.".
Page 1, delete lines 17 through 18.
Delete pages 2 through 4.
Page 5, delete lines 1 through 25.
Page 5, line 26, delete "2027." and insert "2028.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to SB 63 as introduced.)
ROGERS, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 11, Nays 0.
SB 63—LS 6204/DI 153